Massachusetts, session 194th, H2078.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 9 of chapter 150E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 1, the words “a reasonable period”
and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 6 months.
SECTION 2. Said section 9 of said chapter 150E, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting, in line 19, after the word “mediation” the following words:- not to exceed
6 months.
SECTION 3. Said section 9 of said chapter 150E, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:- The provisions of section 9A
of 2

shall not apply once a petition for a determination of the existence of an impasse is filed under
this section, unless the negotiation pertains to public safety employees.
SECTION 4. Section 9A of said chapter 150E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out subsection (a) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(a) No public employee or public employee organization prior to 6 months of negotiation
over the terms of a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to section 9 shall engage in a strike,
work stoppage, slowdown or withholding of services by such public employees; provided,
however, that no public safety employee or public safety employee organization shall engage in
a strike, work stoppage, slowdown or withholding of services in any circumstance.
of 2